Illinois, session 104th, SB2737.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2LLLL as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2LLLL new)7    Sec. 2LLLL. Grocery store coupons. A grocery store that 8offers a digital coupon to consumers shall make available a 9corresponding paper coupon of equal value. The paper coupons 10shall be easily accessible at the service desk and may also be 11placed in other locations around the store. A grocery store 12that violates this Section commits an unlawful practice within 13the meaning of this Act.